Hawaii, session 2026, SB3319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 328G, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§328G-    Age-verification; manufactured hemp products.  (a)  For the purposes of complying with any state law or rule restricting the sale of a manufactured hemp product to persons under twenty-one years of age, it shall be an affirmative defense that the manufactured hemp product retailer that sells a manufactured hemp product to a person under twenty-one years of age in violation of any state law or rule restricting the sale of a manufactured hemp product to persons under twenty-one years of age had reasonably relied upon a third-party age-verification service establishing that person's age as at least twenty-one years of age before selling the person a manufactured hemp product.  The failure of a manufactured hemp product retailer to request and examine photographic identification from a person under twenty-one years of age or utilize a third-party age‑verification service before the sale of a manufactured hemp product to the person shall be construed against the manufactured hemp product retailer and form a conclusive basis for the manufactured hemp product retailer's violation of any state law or rule restricting the sale of a hemp-derived product to persons under twenty-one years of age. (b)  For the purposes of this section, "third-party age‑verification service" means a person or entity, independent of the retailer, that uses commercially reasonable methods to verify a purchaser's age, including verification based on government-issued photographic identification or reliable data sources." SECTION 2.  Section 328G-13, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c) It shall be an affirmative defense that the manufactured hemp product retailer that sells a tincture to a person under twenty-one years of age in violation of this section had requested, examined, and reasonably relied upon a photographic identification from the person or a third-party age-verification service establishing that person's age as at least twenty-one years of age before selling the person a tincture.  The failure of a manufactured hemp product retailer to request and examine photographic identification from a person under twenty-one years of age before the sale of a tincture to the person shall be construed against the manufactured hemp product retailer and form a conclusive basis for the manufactured hemp product retailer's violation of this section.  For the purposes of this subsection, "third-party age‑verification service" has the same meaning as defined in section 328G-  ." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________